Tennessee, session 114, HB0187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-905(g), is amended by deleting
subdivision (6) and substituting:
(6) The office of the comptroller of the treasury shall review the foundational
literacy skills plans submitted to the department for approval to ensure the plans comply
with the requirements of subsection (f) and the rules promulgated by the state board. As
part of the review, the comptroller, or the comptroller's designee, shall examine whether
the plans were initially approved or denied by the department and the nature of any plan
revisions or amendments required by the department for approval. The comptroller shall
include its findings from the review in the report required pursuant to § 49-1-910.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-910, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The office of the comptroller of the treasury shall review data, practices, and
outcomes related to this part. The department of education shall provide any information
requested by the office of the comptroller of the treasury to the comptroller's office as
soon as practicable. Every three (3) years, the comptroller shall submit a report detailing
the findings of the review to the chair of the education committee of the senate, the chair
of the committee of the house of representatives having jurisdiction over student literacy,
and the state board of education and publish the report on the comptroller's website.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0187
000791
- 1 -